Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1261
Declaration of intent.

It is hereby declared that the lending of money is an activity which affects the economic conditions of the State of Nebraska, that Nebraska is a state short of sufficient capital to properly serve the needs of the state, especially the agricultural credit requirements and housing credit requirements, and that if additional funds are deposited into the commercial banking channels and capital stock financial institution or qualifying mutual financial institution channels the available capital will increase many times the amount of the initial deposit.

Laws 1978, LB 258, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 175, § 2.